Hawaii statutes.
§490:9-707 Amendment of pre-effective-date
financing statement. (a) In this section, "pre-effective-date
financing statement" means a financing statement filed before this article
takes effect.

(b) After this article takes effect, a person
may add or delete collateral covered by, continue, or terminate the
effectiveness of, or otherwise amend the information provided in, a
pre-effective-date financing statement only in accordance with the law of the
jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in part 3. However, the
effectiveness of a pre-effective-date financing statement also may be
terminated in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the
financing statement is filed.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection
(d), if the law of this State governs perfection of a security interest, the
information in a pre-effective-date financing statement may be amended after
this article takes effect only if:

(1) The pre-effective-date financing statement and an
amendment are filed in the office specified in section 490:9-501;

(2) An amendment is filed in the office specified in
section 490:9-501 concurrently with, or after the filing in that office of, an
initial financing statement that satisfies section 490:9-706(c); or

(3) An initial financing statement that provides the
information as amended and satisfies section 490:9-706(c) is filed in the
office specified in section 490:9-501.

(d) If the law of this State governs
perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective-date
financing statement may be continued only under section 490:9-705(d) and (f) or
490:9-706.

(e) Whether or not the law of this State
governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a
pre-effective-date financing statement filed in this State may be terminated
after this article takes effect by filing a termination statement in the office
in which the pre-effective-date financing statement is filed, unless an initial
financing statement that satisfies section 490:9-706(c) has been filed in the
office specified by the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as
provided in part 3 as the office in which to file a financing statement. [L
2001, c 228, §1]

Note

This section is new. Former §490:9-707 renumbered as
§490:9-708.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next